Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.110

Washington advanced college tuition payment program—Refunds.

(1) The intent of the Washington advanced college tuition payment program is to redeem tuition units for attendance at an institution of higher education. Refunds shall be issued under specific conditions that may include the following:

(a) Certification that the beneficiary, who is eighteen years of age or older, will not attend an institution of higher education, will result in a refund not to exceed the current value, as determined by the governing body, in effect at the time of such certification minus a penalty at the rate established by the governing body. The refund shall be made no sooner than ninety days after such certification, less any administrative processing fees assessed by the governing body;

(b) If there is certification of the death or disability of the beneficiary, the refund shall be equal to one hundred percent of any remaining unused tuition units at the current value, as determined by the governing body, at the time that such certification is submitted to the governing body, less any administrative processing fees assessed by the governing body;

(c) If there is certification by the student of graduation or program completion, the refund shall be as great as one hundred percent of any remaining unused tuition units at the current value, as determined by the governing body, at the time that such certification is submitted to the governing body, less any administrative processing fees assessed by the governing body. The governing body may, at its discretion, impose a penalty if needed to comply with federal tax rules;

(d) If there is certification of other tuition and fee scholarships, which will cover the cost of tuition for the eligible beneficiary. The refund shall be equal to one hundred percent of the current value of tuition units, as determined by the governing body, in effect at the time of the refund request, less any administrative processing fees assessed by the governing body. The refund under this subsection may not exceed the value of the scholarship;

(e) Incorrect or misleading information provided by the purchaser or beneficiaries may result in a refund of the purchaser's investment, less any administrative processing fees assessed by the governing body. The value of the refund will not exceed the actual dollar value of the purchaser's contributions; and

(f) The governing body may determine other circumstances qualifying for refunds of remaining unused tuition units and may determine the value of that refund.

(2) With the exception of subsection (1)(b), (e), and (f) of this section no refunds may be made before the units have been held for two years.

[ 2005 c 272 s 4; 2001 c 184 s 3; 2000 c 14 s 8; 1997 c 289 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 184 s 3: "Section 3 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2001." [ 2001 c 184 s 5.]